Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1236
Lights; visibility requirements.

Every white light prescribed by sections 37-1233 to 37-1235 shall be of such character as to be visible at a distance of at least two miles. Every colored light prescribed by sections 37-1233 to 37-1235 shall be of such character as to be visible at a distance of at least one mile. The word visible in this section, when applied to lights, shall mean visible on a dark night with clear atmosphere.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 36.